Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1712.02
Monetary judgment, defined.

Monetary judgment
shall mean a monetary judgment against an obligor that is unsatisfied and
is owed to the federal or state governmental unit in a case in which services
are being provided under Title IV-D of the federal Social Security Act, as
amended, and the judgment is related to the support of a child. Monetary judgment
includes, but is not limited to, the cost of genetic testing that the obligor
has been ordered to pay by a court, plus any accumulated interest on the judgment
under sections 45-103 to 45-103.04, whether the order was issued prior to,
on, or after July 15, 2010.

Laws 2010, LB712, § 30.